Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 2. Licensing Providers of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

§ 37.2-403.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Brain injury”
means any injury to the brain that occurs after birth that is acquired through traumatic or non-traumatic insults. Non-traumatic insults may include but are not limited to anoxia, hypoxia, aneurysm, toxic exposure, encephalopathy, surgical interventions, tumor, and stroke. “Brain injury” does not include hereditary, congenital, or degenerative brain disorders, or injuries induced by birth trauma.

“Conditional license”
means a license issued in accordance with the requirements of §

37.2-415

to a provider for a new service for a period of time sufficient to allow the provider to demonstrate compliance with regulations of the Board governing licensure of providers.

“Full license”
means a license issued in accordance with the requirements of §

37.2-404

to a provider who demonstrates full compliance with the regulations of the Board governing licensure of providers.

“Provider”
means any person, entity, or organization, excluding an agency of the federal government by whatever name or designation, that delivers (i) services to individuals with mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse or (ii) residential services for persons with brain injury. The person, entity, or organization shall include a hospital as defined in §

32.1-123

, community services board, behavioral health authority, private provider, and any other similar or related person, entity, or organization. It shall not include any individual practitioner who holds a license issued by a health regulatory board of the Department of Health Professions or who is exempt from licensing pursuant to §

54.1-3501

,

54.1-3601

, or

54.1-3701

.

“Provisional license”
means a license issued to a provider previously issued a full license that has demonstrated a temporary inability to maintain compliance with licensing or human rights regulations or that has failed to comply with a previous corrective action plan, and that allows the provider to continue operating for a limited time while addressing the inability or failure to comply with regulations.

“Service or services”
means:

Planned individualized interventions intended to reduce or ameliorate mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse through care, treatment, training, habilitation, or other supports that are delivered by a provider to persons with mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. Services include outpatient services, intensive in-home services, opioid treatment services, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, community gero-psychiatric residential services, assertive community treatment, and other clinical services; day support, day treatment, partial hospitalization, psychosocial rehabilitation, and habilitation services; case management services; and supportive residential, special school, halfway house, in-home services, crisis stabilization, and other residential services; and

Planned individualized interventions intended to reduce or ameliorate the effects of brain injury through care, treatment, or other supports provided in residential services for persons with brain injury.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-254; 1950, p. 935; 1960, c. 496; 1964, c. 54; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-179; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 182; 1976, c. 671; 1977, cc. 89, 346; 1979, c. 54; 1980, c. 582; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2002, c. 56; 2005, cc. 716, 718, 725; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, c. 497; 2017, c. 458; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 3, 257.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 718 and 725, amended former § 37.1-179, from which this section was derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, Acts 2005, cc. 718 and 725, have been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendments by cc. 718 and 725 are identical, and inserted the definition of “Brain injury,” inserted items (iii) and (iv) in the definition of “Provider” and added subdivision 3 in the definition of “Service or services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 718 and 725, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “persons” and “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” throughout the definitions of “Provider” and “Service or services”; deleted former clause (iii), which read “services to persons under the Brain Injury Waiver” and redesignated former clause (iv) as (iii) in the paragraph defining “Provider”; and in paragraph 3 of the definition of “Service or services,” deleted “under the Brain Injury Waiver or” following “or other supports provided.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 497 added the definitions of “Conditional license,” “Full license,” and “Provisional license.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458, substituted “developmental disabilities” for “intellectual disability” throughout; in the definition of “Provider,” deleted former clause (ii) which read: “services to individuals who receive day support, in-home support, or crisis stabilization services funded through the Individual and Families Developmental Disabilities Support Waiver, or”; in the definition of “Service or services,”
inserted “in-home services, crisis stabilization” in subdivision 1, deleted former subdivision 2 which read: “Day support, in-home support, and crisis stabilization services provided to individuals under the Individual and Families Developmental Disabilities Support Waiver; and”; and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 3 and 257, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “means” for “is” and deleted “but before age 65” following “after birth” in the definition of “Brain injury.”

§ 37.2-404.
Authority of Commissioner to grant licenses.

The Commissioner, subject to regulations adopted by the Board, may license any suitable provider to establish, maintain and operate, or have charge of any service.

History.

1980, c. 582, § 37.1-179.1; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2002, c. 56; 2005, c. 716.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 7, cl. 1, effective February 25, 2005, and Acts 2005, c. 64, cl. 1, provide: “§ 1. Standards for the evaluation of the need and appropriateness for certain new licenses; moratorium on licensure of providers until standards in place.

“A. In addition to the existing regulations, the State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board shall establish, pursuant to the Administrative Process Act, standards to evaluate the need and appropriateness for the issuance of new licenses to providers of treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of Methadone or any other controlled substance approved by the Food & Drug Administration for the use in opiate treatment. The standards shall include criteria for (i) determination of need for new clinics, taking into consideration (a) the number of persons residing in the service area who are known or reasonably estimated to be in need of such treatment; (b) the availability of relevant staff in the service area; and (c) the building or space proposed to be the site of the new clinic and its suitability; (ii) the availability of counseling or other services necessary for effective treatment of persons with opiate addiction; (iii) existing access to such treatment, including through physicians’ offices; (iv) the reasonable parameters, both geographic and demographic, of a clinic’s service area; and (v) the proposed clinic’s plan of operation, including security and accountability measures.

“B. Notwithstanding the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services’ discretion to grant licenses to providers of treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of the controlled substance, methadone, or other opioid replacements, a moratorium on the issuance of new licenses for such providers shall be in effect from the enactment date of this act until the date on which the regulations required by subsection A become effective.”

Acts 2005, cc. 7 and 64, cl. 2, provide: “That the State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

§ 37.2-405.
License required; exception; license not transferable; operation of existing services; persons not to be admitted, etc., to unlicensed providers.

No provider shall establish, conduct, maintain, or operate or continue to operate in the Commonwealth any service, without being licensed under this article, except where the provider is exempt from licensing.

No license issued under this article shall be assignable or transferable.

No person shall be admitted, placed, treated, maintained, housed, or otherwise kept, voluntarily or involuntarily, by any provider required to be licensed by subsection A, unless and until the provider is licensed by the Commissioner.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 181, § 37.1-183.1; 1976, c. 671; 1977, c. 346; 1980, c. 582; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-405.1.
Certain provider information on website.

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall list licensed providers included on the website of the Department’s Office of Licensing by the assumed or fictitious name under which the provider is doing business in the Commonwealth. Within the file of that record following the name under which the provider does business in the Commonwealth, the record shall also include any other Virginia corporate name of the provider, if different from the assumed or fictitious name under which the provider is doing business.

History.

2013, c. 451.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 451 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 37.2-405.2.
Certain information required of applicants to operate a licensed service.

Every applicant for licensure to establish, conduct, maintain, or operate or continue to operate a licensed service in the Commonwealth shall submit, together with an application for licensure:

A working budget showing projected revenue and expenses for the first year of operation, including a revenue plan;

Documentation of working capital to include (i) documentation of funds or a line of credit in the name of the applicant or owner sufficient to cover at least 90 days of operating expenses if the provider is a corporation, an unincorporated organization or association, a sole proprietor, or a partnership or (ii) appropriated revenue if the provider is a state or local government agency, board, or commission;

Documentation of authority to conduct business in the Commonwealth;

A statement of (i) the legal name of the applicant and, if the applicant is an association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the names and addresses of its officers, agents, sponsors, partners, shareholders, or members and (ii) the legal name under which the applicant, any entity that operates group homes that is affiliated with or under common ownership or control with the applicant, and any entity that operates group homes and that is affiliated with or under common ownership or control with any officer, agent, sponsor, partner, shareholder or member of the applicant to which a license to operate a service has been issued in any other state, together with a list of the states in which such licenses have been issued and the dates for which such licenses were issued;

A statement of any previous revocation, suspensions, or sanction comparable to those set forth in §

37.2-419

against any license to operate a service issued to the applicant or any entity affiliated with the applicant in any other state, including the dates and descriptions of such disciplinary actions or sanctions;

A description of the specific services to be offered by the applicant including such elements as may be specified by the Department in regulations;

A staffing plan, including information regarding employee credentials and job descriptions, containing such elements as may be specified by the Department in regulations;

Operating policies that contain such elements as may be specified by the Department in regulations; and

Any additional documentation as may be required by the Department.

The Commissioner may refuse to grant a license to any application who fails or refuses to provide any information required to be submitted pursuant to subsection A.

History.

2020, c. 723.

§ 37.2-406.
(Effective until January 1, 2023) Conditions for initial licensure of certain providers.

Notwithstanding the Commissioner’s discretion to grant licenses pursuant to this article or any Board regulation regarding licensing, no initial license shall be granted by the Commissioner to a provider of treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration if the provider is to be located within one-half mile of a public or private licensed day care center or a public or private K-12 school, except when such service is provided by a hospital licensed by the Board of Health or the Commissioner or is owned or operated by an agency of the Commonwealth.

No provider shall be required to conduct, maintain, or operate services for the treatment of persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration on Sunday, except when such service is provided by a hospital licensed by the Board of Health or the Commissioner or is owned or operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, subject to regulations or guidelines issued by the Department consistent with the health, safety and welfare of individuals receiving services and the security of take-home doses of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

Upon receiving notice of a proposal for or an application to obtain an initial license from a provider of treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, the Commissioner shall, within 15 days of the receipt, notify the local governing body of and the community services board serving the jurisdiction in which the facility is to be located of the proposal or application and the facility’s proposed location.Within 30 days of the date of the notice, the local governing body and community services board shall submit to the Commissioner comments on the proposal or application. The local governing body shall notify the Commissioner within 30 days of the date of the notice concerning the compliance of the applicant with this section and any applicable local ordinances.

No license shall be issued by the Commissioner to the provider until the conditions of this section have been met, i.e., local governing body and community services board comments have been received and the local governing body has determined compliance with the provisions of this section and any relevant local ordinances.

No applicant for a license to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration that has obtained a certificate of occupancy in accordance with the law and regulations in effect on January 1, 2004, shall be required to comply with the provisions of this section with respect to the existing facility for which the certificate of occupancy was obtained. No existing licensed provider shall be required to comply with the provisions of this section with respect to an existing facility in which it is currently providing such treatment. License applicants and licensees who fall within this exception shall, however, be required to comply with the provisions of this section for purposes of relocating an existing facility or establishing a new facility.

The provisions of subsections A and E shall not apply to (i) the jurisdictions in Planning District 8, (ii) an applicant for a license for the purpose of relocating within a city located in Planning District 23 a facility to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of methadone or other opioid replacements that has been providing such treatment in the same city since 1984 and is operated by and located with a community services board, or (iii) an applicant for a license to operate in its current location as a facility to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of methadone or other opioid replacements when the facility is located within one-half mile of a public or private licensed day care center or a public or private K-12 school in Henrico County, the City of Newport News, or the City of Richmond and has been licensed and operated as a facility to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of methadone or other opioid replacements by another provider immediately prior to submission of the application for a license.

History.

2004, cc. 823, 845, § 37.1-179.2; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 513; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, cc. 173, 415; 2016, c. 480; 2018, cc. 187, 816.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 513 added subsection B; redesignated former subsections B through E as present subsections C through F; and substituted “Upon” for “Further, upon” at the beginning of subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” near the end of subsection B, and deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection F.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 173 and 415 are identical, and in subsection E inserted “with respect to the existing facility for which the certificate of occupancy was obtained,” substituted “with respect to an existing facility” for “in any city or county,” and added the last sentence; and in subsection F inserted “and subsection E” and the language beginning “or to an applicant” at the end.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 480, in subsection A, substituted “(i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements, other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration” for “methadone or other opioid replacements” or similar language in subsections A, C and E and twice in subsection B; and substituted “subsections A and E” for “subsection A and subsection E” in subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 187 and 816 are nearly identical, and added clause (iii) in subsection F. In addition c. 816 inserted “the City of Newport News” in clause (iii).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 512 and 513, effective January 1, 2023, are identical, and deleted former subsection A and redesignated accordingly, which read: “Notwithstanding the Commissioner's discretion to grant licenses pursuant to this article or any Board regulation regarding licensing, no initial license shall be granted by the Commissioner to a provider of treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration if the provider is to be located within one-half mile of a public or private licensed day care center or a public or private K-12 school, except when such service is provided by a hospital licensed by the Board of Health or the Commissioner or is owned or operated by an agency of the Commonwealth.”; redesignated the second occurrences of clauses (i) and (ii) to (a) and (b) of subsection A; rewrote subsection C, which read: “No license shall be issued by the Commissioner to the provider until the conditions of this section have been met, i.e, local governing body and community services board comments have been received and has determined compliance with the provisions of this section and any relevant local ordinances.”; deleted subsection E, which read: “E. No applicant for a license to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration that has obtained a certificate of occupancy in accordance with the law and regulations in effect on January 1, 2004, shall be required to comply with the provisions of this section with respect to the existing facility for which the certificate of occupancy was obtained. No existing licensed provider shall be required to comply with the provisions of this section with respect to an existing facility in which it is currently providing such treatment. License applicants and licensees who fall within this exception shall, however, be required to comply with the provisions of this section for purposes of relocating an existing facility or establishing a new facility.”; deleted subsection F, which read: “F. The provisions of subsections A and E shall not apply to (i) the jurisdictions in Planning District 8, (ii) an applicant for a license for the purpose of relocating within a city located in Planning District 23 a facility to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of methadone or other opioid replacements that has been providing such treatment in the same city since 1984 and is operated by and located with a community services board, or (iii) an applicant for a license to operate in its current location as a facility to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of methadone or other opioid replacements when the facility is located within one-half mile of a public or private licensed day care center or a public or private K-12 school in Henrico County, the City of Newport News, or the City of Richmond and has been licensed and operated as a facility to provide treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of methadone or other opioid replacements by another provider immediately prior to submission of the application for a license.”

§ 37.2-406.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Conditions for initial licensure of certain providers.

No provider shall be required to conduct, maintain, or operate services for the treatment of persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration on Sunday, except when such service is provided by a hospital licensed by the Board of Health or the Commissioner or is owned or operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, subject to regulations or guidelines issued by the Department consistent with the health, safety and welfare of individuals receiving services and the security of take-home doses of (a) methadone or (b) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.

Upon receiving notice of a proposal for or an application to obtain an initial license from a provider of treatment for persons with opiate addiction through the use of (i) methadone or (ii) opioid replacements other than opioid replacements approved for the treatment of opioid addiction by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, the Commissioner shall, within 15 days of the receipt, notify the local governing body of and the community services board serving the jurisdiction in which the facility is to be located of the proposal or application and the facility’s proposed location.

Within 30 days of the date of the notice, the local governing body and community services board shall submit to the Commissioner comments on the proposal or application. The local governing body shall notify the Commissioner within 30 days of the date of the notice concerning the compliance of the applicant with any applicable local ordinances.

No license shall be issued by the Commissioner to the provider until the conditions of this section, including those related to receipt of comments provided by the local governing body and community services board and determination of compliance with local ordinances by the local governing body, have been met.

History.

2004, cc. 823, 845, § 37.1-179.2; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 513; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2014, cc. 173, 415; 2016, c. 480; 2018, cc. 187, 816; 2022, cc. 512, 513.

For this section as in effect until January 1, 2023

, see the bound volume.

§ 37.2-407.
Regulations for treatment of pregnant women with substance abuse.

The Board shall adopt regulations that ensure that providers licensed to offer substance abuse services develop policies and procedures for the timely and appropriate treatment of pregnant women with substance abuse.

History.

1992, c. 428, § 37.1-182.1; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-408.
Regulation of services delivered in group homes and residential facilities for children.

The Department shall assist and cooperate with other state departments in fulfilling their respective licensing and certification responsibilities. The Board shall adopt regulations that shall allow the Department to so assist and cooperate with other state departments. The Board may adopt regulations to enhance cooperation and assistance among agencies licensing similar programs.

The Board’s regulations shall establish the Department as the single licensing agency, with the exception of educational programs licensed by the Department of Education, for group homes or residential facilities providing mental health, developmental, brain injury, or substance abuse services other than facilities operated or regulated by the Department of Juvenile Justice. Such regulations shall address the services required to be provided in group homes and residential facilities for children as it may deem appropriate to ensure the health and safety of the children. In addition, the Board’s regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to (i) specifications for the structure and accommodations of such homes and facilities according to the needs of the children to be placed; (ii) rules concerning allowable activities, local government- and home- or facility-imposed curfews, and study, recreational, and bedtime hours; and (iii) a requirement that each facility have a community liaison who shall be responsible for facilitating cooperative relationships with the neighbors, the school system, local law enforcement, local government officials, and the community at large.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsection D, the Commissioner may issue a summary order of suspension of the license of a group home or residential facility for children licensed pursuant to the Board’s regulations under subsection A, in conjunction with any proceeding for revocation, denial, or other action, when conditions or practices exist in the home or facility that pose an immediate and substantial threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the children who are residents and the Commissioner believes the operation should be suspended during the pendency of such proceeding.

The summary order of suspension shall take effect upon its issuance and shall be served on the licensee or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service and certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the licensee. The order shall state the time, date, and location of a hearing to determine whether the suspension is appropriate. Such hearing shall be held no later than three business days after the issuance of the summary order of suspension and shall be convened by the Commissioner or his designee.After such hearing, the Commissioner may issue a final order of summary suspension or may find that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented. A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the licensee may appeal the Commissioner’s decision to the appropriate circuit court no later than 10 days following issuance of the order. The sole issue before the court shall be whether the Department had reasonable grounds to require the licensee to cease operations during the pendency of the concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding. The concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding shall not be affected by the outcome of any hearing on the appropriateness of the summary suspension.The willful and material failure to comply with the summary order of suspension or final order of summary suspension shall be punishable as a Class 2 misdemeanor. The Commissioner may require the cooperation of any other agency or subdivision of the Commonwealth in the relocation of children who are residents of a home or facility whose license has been summarily suspended pursuant to this section and in any other actions necessary to reduce the risk of further harm to children.

In addition to the requirements set forth above, the Board’s regulations shall require, as a condition of initial licensure or, if appropriate, license renewal, that the applicant shall: (i) be personally interviewed by Department personnel to determine the qualifications of the owner or operator before granting an initial license; (ii) provide evidence of having relevant prior experience before any initial license is granted; (iii) provide, as a condition of initial license or renewal licensure, evidence of staff participation in training on appropriate siting of the residential facilities for children, good neighbor policies, and community relations; and (iv) be required to screen children prior to admission to exclude children with behavioral issues, such as histories of violence, that cannot be managed in the relevant residential facility.

In addition, the Department shall:

Notify relevant local governments and placing and funding agencies, including the Office of Children’s Services, of multiple health and safety or human rights violations in residential facilities for which the Department serves as lead licensure agency when such violations result in the lowering of the licensure status of the facility to provisional;

Post on the Department’s website information concerning the application for initial licensure of or renewal, denial, or provisional licensure of any residential facility for children located in the locality;

Require all licensees to self-report lawsuits against or settlements with residential facility operators relating to the health and safety or human rights of residents and any criminal charges that may have been made relating to the health and safety or human rights of children receiving services;

Require proof of contractual agreements or staff expertise to provide educational services, counseling services, psychological services, medical services, or any other services needed to serve the children receiving services in accordance with the facility’s operational plan;

Modify the term of the license at any time during the term of the license based on a change in compliance; and

Disseminate to local governments, or post on the Department’s website, an accurate (updated weekly or monthly as necessary) list of licensed and operating group homes and other residential facilities for children by locality with information on services and identification of the lead licensure agency.

History.

1990, c. 311, § 37.1-189.1; 2005, cc. 358, 363, 471, 485, 716; 2006, c. 781; 2008, c. 873; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2015, c. 366.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 358 and 471 amended former § 37.1-189.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by cc. 358 and 471 have been given effect in this section as set out above by adding subsection B.

Acts 2005, cc. 363 and 485 amended former § 37.1-189.1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by cc. 363 and 485 have been given effect in this section as set out above by adding subsections C and D.

Acts 2005, cc. 363 and 485, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 363 and 485, cl. 3 provides: “That the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services shall establish a protocol for the expedited appointment of a hearing officer for the summary suspension of licenses in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2006, c. 781, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], Board of Social Services, and the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2006, c. 781, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education, Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], Board of Social Services, and the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall also include in the emergency regulations required by the second enactment clause provisions to implement the requirements enacted by HB 2461 (2005) and SB 1304 (2005) [Acts 2005, cc. 358, 471].”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the Board of Social Services, and the Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than October 31, 2009.”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 3 provides: “That the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities (22 VAC 42-11-10 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until such time as each Board required to promulgate regulations pursuant to this act promulgates such regulations as required by this act. Upon promulgation of regulations by a Board as required by this act, the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities shall cease to apply to facilities licensed and regulated by that Board.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 781 added subsections E and F.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 873 deleted “and in reducing and simplifying the regulations involved in such licensing and certification” from the end of the first sentence in subsection A; in subsection B, inserted the first sentence and substituted “Such regulations shall” for “The Board’s regulations shall” at the beginning of the second sentence; added subdivision F 6 and made related changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “mental health, developmental, brain injury” for “mental health, mental retardation, brain injury” in the first sentence of subsection B; substituted “(iv) be required to screen children prior to admission to exclude children with” for “(iv) be required to screen residents prior to admission to exclude individuals with” in subsection E; and in subsection F, substituted “children receiving services” for “residents” in subdivisions 3 and 4.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 366 substituted “Office of Children’s Services” for “Office of Comprehensive Services” in subdivision F 1.